Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2036YH (3) 91 lh/ko H.F. 408 Section 1. MEDICAID HOME AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES 1 WAIVERS ââ ELIMINATION OF CURRENT WAITING LISTS. There 2 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 3 department of health and human services for the fiscal year 4 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, an amount 5 sufficient, as calculated by the Medicaid forecasting group 6 consisting of staff members from the department of health 7 and human services, the department of management, and the 8 fiscal services division of the legislative services agency, 9 to eliminate the waiting lists as of June 30, 2025, for the 10 Medicaid home and community-based services waivers. The 11 forecasting group shall include the amount appropriated and the 12 number of individuals eliminated from the waiting lists in the 13 first forecasting report published in the fiscal year beginning 14 July 1, 2025. 15